Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-136
Garfield.

The county of Garfield is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township numbered twenty-one, north, of range thirteen, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence north to the northeast corner of township numbered twenty-four in range thirteen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township numbered twenty-four, in range sixteen, west; thence south to the southwest corner of township numbered twenty-one, north, in range sixteen, west; thence east to the place of beginning.

Formed from Wheeler County by vote of electors pursuant to Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, and proclamation of Governor, Oct. 4, 1884;

R.S.1913, § 849;

C.S.1922, § 751;

C.S.1929, § 25-138;

R.S.1943, § 22-136.